North Carolina, session 2025, SB1079.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. S.L. 2019-99 is repealed.
SECTION 2. For the purposes of this act, the term "development approval" shall
have the same meaning as in G.S. 160D-102(13).
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding G.S. 160D-403 and G.S. 160D-705, the Brunswick
County Board of Commissioners shall make the final decision on all development approvals in
Brunswick County. The official record of all meetings where a development approval is decided
shall reflect how each member voted on each development approval before the Board.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S1079-v-1*